Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1746.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3311.14, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3311.14. Upon completion of a handgun qualification


course for court officials developed by the Council on Law


Enforcement Education and Training, the Attorney General and any


assistant attorney general may carry a firearm on his or her person


anywhere in throughout this state for personal protection only. The


Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training may provide for an


identification card to be issued to the Attorney General or


assistant attorney general and may provide application forms. If


the person issued an identification card is no longer eligible, that


person shall immediately return the identification card to the


Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training.

Req. No. 3516 Page 1


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3516 CN 1/14/2026 2:38:56 PM











































Req. No. 3516 Page 2